New York, session 2025-2026, A4884.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public housing law is amended by adding a new section 2 223-c to read as follows: 3 § 223-c. Discrimination against persons who own certain dogs. No 4 person shall be denied occupancy in a dwelling in any project or be 5 subjected to eviction from any such dwelling on the grounds that such 6 person owns a dog of a specific breed, size, or weight and such dog 7 resides with such person. Nothing in this section shall be construed to 8 prohibit any authority from prescribing and enforcing reasonable 9 restrictions or requirements on the ownership of dogs, regardless of 10 their breed, size, or weight, or on the ownership of dangerous dogs as 11 prescribed in section one hundred twenty-three of the agriculture and 12 markets law. 13 § 2. Article 7 of the real property law is amended by adding a new 14 section 238-b to read as follows: 15 § 238-b. Discrimination in leases with respect to certain dogs. No 16 person, firm or corporation owning or having in charge any apartment 17 house, tenement house or other building or mobile home park used for 18 dwelling purposes shall restrict a tenant's ability to own a dog of a 19 specific breed, size or weight. Nothing in this section shall be 20 construed to prohibit such persons, firms or corporations from prescrib- 21 ing and enforcing reasonable restrictions or requirements on the owner- 22 ship of dogs, regardless of their breed, size or weight, or on the 23 ownership of dangerous dogs as prescribed in section one hundred twen- 24 ty-three of the agriculture and markets law. 25 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08362-01-5